Ohio, session 136, HB64.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Ohio:
S 1. That sections 1533.10, 1533.11, 1533.111, 1533.32, and 1533.321 of the Revised
ECTION
Code be amended to read as follows:
Sec. 1533.10. (A) Except as provided in this section or division (A)(2) of section 1533.12 or
section 1533.73 or 1533.731 of the Revised Code, no person shall hunt any wild bird or wild
quadruped without a hunting license. Each day that any person hunts within the state without
procuring such a license constitutes a separate offense.
(B)(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, division (A) of section 1533.12 of the
Revised Code, or in rules adopted under division (B) of that section, each applicant for a hunting
license shall pay an annual fee for each annual license in accordance with the following schedule:
1 2
A Hunting license - resident $18.00
B Hunting license - nonresident that is not a resident of a reciprocal state, ages $174.00
18 and older
C Hunting license - nonresident that is a resident of a reciprocal state, ages 18 $18.00
and older
D Apprentice hunting license - resident $18.00
E Apprentice hunting license - nonresident that is not a resident of a reciprocal $174.00
state
F Apprentice hunting license - nonresident that is a resident of a reciprocal state $18.00
G Youth hunting license - resident and nonresident $9.00

H. B. No. 64 136th G.A.
2
H Apprentice youth hunting license - resident $9.00
I Senior hunting license - resident $9.00
J Apprentice senior hunting license - resident $9.00
(2) Apprentice resident hunting licenses, apprentice youth hunting licenses, apprentice senior
hunting licenses, and apprentice nonresident hunting licenses are subject to the requirements
established under section 1533.102 of the Revised Code and rules adopted under it.
(3) As used in division (B)(1) of this section:
(a) "Youth" means an applicant who is under the age of eighteen years at the time of
application for a license.
(b) "Senior" means an applicant who is sixty-six sixty-five years of age or older at the time
of application for a license.
(c) "Reciprocal state" means a state that is a party to an agreement under section 1533.91 of
the Revised Code.
(C) A resident of this state who owns lands in the state and the owner's children of any age
and grandchildren under eighteen years of age may hunt on the lands without a hunting license. A
resident of any other state who owns real property in this state, and the spouse and children living
with the property owner, may hunt on that property without a license, provided that the state of
residence of the real property owner allows residents of this state owning real property in that state,
and the spouse and children living with the property owner, to hunt without a license. If the owner of
land in this state is a limited liability company or a limited liability partnership that consists of three
or fewer individual members or partners, as applicable, an individual member or partner who is a
resident of this state and the member's or partner's children of any age and grandchildren under
eighteen years of age may hunt on the land owned by the limited liability company or limited
liability partnership without a hunting license. In addition, if the owner of land in this state is a trust
that has a total of three or fewer trustees and beneficiaries, an individual who is a trustee or
beneficiary and who is a resident of this state and the individual's children of any age and
grandchildren under eighteen years of age may hunt on the land owned by the trust without a
hunting license. The tenant and children of the tenant, residing on lands in the state, may hunt on
them without a hunting license.
(D) The chief of the division of wildlife may issue a small game hunting license expiring
three days from the effective date of the license to a nonresident of the state, the fee for which is
thirty-nine dollars. No person shall take or possess deer, wild turkeys, fur-bearing animals, ducks,
geese, brant, or any nongame animal while possessing only a small game hunting license.
A small game hunting license or an apprentice nonresident hunting license does not
authorize the taking or possessing of ducks, geese, or brant without having obtained, in addition to
the small game hunting license or the apprentice nonresident hunting license, a wetlands habitat

H. B. No. 64 136th G.A.
3
stamp as provided in section 1533.112 of the Revised Code. A small game hunting license or an
apprentice nonresident hunting license does not authorize the taking or possessing of deer, wild
turkeys, or fur-bearing animals. A nonresident of the state who wishes to take or possess deer, wild
turkeys, or fur-bearing animals in this state shall procure, respectively, a deer or wild turkey permit
as provided in section 1533.11 of the Revised Code or a fur taker permit as provided in section
1533.111 of the Revised Code in addition to a nonresident hunting license, an apprentice nonresident
hunting license, a special youth hunting license, or an apprentice youth hunting license, as
applicable, as provided in this section.
(E) No person shall procure or attempt to procure a hunting license by fraud, deceit,
misrepresentation, or any false statement.
(F)(1) This section does not authorize the taking and possessing of deer or wild turkeys
without first having obtained, in addition to the hunting license required by this section, a deer or
wild turkey permit as provided in section 1533.11 of the Revised Code or the taking and possessing
of ducks, geese, or brant without first having obtained, in addition to the hunting license required by
this section, a wetlands habitat stamp as provided in section 1533.112 of the Revised Code.
(2) This section does not authorize the hunting or trapping of fur-bearing animals without
first having obtained, in addition to a hunting license required by this section, a fur taker permit as
provided in section 1533.111 of the Revised Code.
(G)(1) No hunting license shall be issued unless it is accompanied by a written explanation
of the law in section 1533.17 of the Revised Code and the penalty for its violation, including a
description of terms of imprisonment and fines that may be imposed.
(2) No hunting license, other than an apprentice hunting license, shall be issued unless the
applicant presents to the agent authorized to issue the license a previously held hunting license or
evidence of having held such a license in content and manner approved by the chief, a certificate of
completion issued upon completion of a hunter education and conservation course approved by the
chief, or evidence of equivalent training in content and manner approved by the chief. A previously
held apprentice hunting license does not satisfy the requirement concerning the presentation of a
previously held hunting license or evidence of it.
(3) No person shall issue a hunting license, except an apprentice hunting license, to any
person who fails to present the evidence required by this section. No person shall purchase or obtain
a hunting license, other than an apprentice hunting license, without presenting to the issuing agent
the evidence required by this section. Issuance of a hunting license in violation of the requirements
of this section is an offense by both the purchaser of the illegally obtained hunting license and the
clerk or agent who issued the hunting license. Any hunting license issued in violation of this section
is void.
(H) The chief, with approval of the wildlife council, shall adopt rules prescribing a hunter
education and conservation course for first-time hunting license buyers, other than buyers of
apprentice hunting licenses, and for volunteer instructors. The course shall consist of subjects

H. B. No. 64 136th G.A.
4
including, but not limited to, hunter safety and health, use of hunting implements, hunting tradition
and ethics, the hunter and conservation, the law in section 1533.17 of the Revised Code along with
the penalty for its violation, including a description of terms of imprisonment and fines that may be
imposed, and other law relating to hunting. Authorized personnel of the division or volunteer
instructors approved by the chief shall conduct such courses with such frequency and at such
locations throughout the state as to reasonably meet the needs of license applicants. The chief shall
issue a certificate of completion to each person who successfully completes the course and passes an
examination prescribed by the chief.
Sec. 1533.11. (A)(1) Except as provided in this section or section 1533.731 of the Revised
Code, no person shall hunt deer on lands of another without first obtaining an annual deer permit.
Except as provided in this section, no person shall hunt wild turkeys on lands of another without first
obtaining an annual wild turkey permit. A deer or wild turkey permit is valid during the hunting
license year in which the permit is purchased. Except as provided in rules adopted under division (B)
of section 1533.12 of the Revised Code, each applicant for a deer or wild turkey permit shall pay an
annual fee for each permit in accordance with the following schedule:
1 2
A Deer permit – resident $30.00
B Deer permit – nonresident $74.00
C Youth deer permit – resident and nonresident $15.00
D Senior deer permit – resident $11.00
E Wild turkey permit – resident $30.00
F Wild turkey permit – nonresident $37.00
G Youth wild turkey permit – resident and nonresident $15.00
H Senior wild turkey permit – resident $11.00
(2) As used in division (A)(1) of this section:
(a) "Youth" means an applicant who is under the age of eighteen years at the time of
application for a permit.
(b) "Senior" means an applicant who is sixty-six sixty-five years of age or older at the time
of application for a permit.
(3) The money received shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the wildlife fund,

H. B. No. 64 136th G.A.
5
created in section 1531.17 of the Revised Code, exclusively for the use of the division of wildlife in
the acquisition and development of land for deer or wild turkey management, for investigating deer
or wild turkey problems, and for the stocking, management, and protection of deer or wild turkey.
(4) Every person, while hunting deer or wild turkey on lands of another, shall carry the
person's deer or wild turkey permit and exhibit it to any enforcement officer so requesting. Failure to
so carry and exhibit such a permit constitutes an offense under this section.
(5) The chief of the division of wildlife shall adopt any additional rules the chief considers
necessary to carry out this section and section 1533.10 of the Revised Code.
(6) An owner who is a resident of this state or an owner who is exempt from obtaining a
hunting license under section 1533.10 of the Revised Code and the children of the owner of lands in
this state may hunt deer or wild turkey thereon without a deer or wild turkey permit. If the owner of
land in this state is a limited liability company or a limited liability partnership that consists of three
or fewer individual members or partners, as applicable, an individual member or partner who is a
resident of this state and the member's or partner's children of any age may hunt deer or wild turkey
on the land owned by the limited liability company or limited liability partnership without a deer or
wild turkey permit. In addition, if the owner of land in this state is a trust that has a total of three or
fewer trustees and beneficiaries, an individual who is a trustee or beneficiary and who is a resident
of this state and the individual's children of any age may hunt deer or wild turkey on the land owned
by the trust without a deer or wild turkey permit. The tenant and children of the tenant may hunt deer
or wild turkey on lands where they reside without a deer or wild turkey permit.
(B) A deer or wild turkey permit is not transferable. No person shall carry a deer or wild
turkey permit issued in the name of another person.
(C) The wildlife refunds fund is hereby created in the state treasury. The fund shall consist of
money received from application fees for deer permits that are not issued. Money in the fund shall
be used to make refunds of such application fees.
(D) If the division establishes a system for the electronic submission of information
regarding deer or wild turkey that are taken, the division shall allow the owner and the children of
the owner of lands in this state to use the owner's name or address for purposes of submitting that
information electronically via that system.
Sec. 1533.111. (A) Except as provided in this section or division (A)(2) of section 1533.12
of the Revised Code, no person shall hunt or trap fur-bearing animals on land of another without first
obtaining some type of an annual fur taker permit.
(B)(1) Except as otherwise provided in rules adopted under division (B) of section 1533.12
of the Revised Code, each applicant for a fur taker permit or an apprentice fur taker permit shall pay
an annual fee for each annual permit in accordance with the following schedule:
1 2

H. B. No. 64 136th G.A.
6
A Fur taker permit $14.00
B Apprentice fur taker permit $14.00
C Senior fur taker permit – resident only $7.00
D Apprentice senior fur taker permit – resident only $7.00
E Special youth fur taker permit $7.00
F Apprentice youth fur taker permit $7.00
(2) As used in division (B)(1) of this section:
(a) "Youth" means an applicant who is under the age of eighteen years at the time of
application for a permit.
(b) "Senior" means an applicant who is sixty-six sixty-five years of age or older at the time
of application for a permit.
(C) Each type of fur taker permit is valid during the hunting license year in which the permit
is purchased. The money received shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the fund
established in section 1533.15 of the Revised Code. Apprentice fur taker permits and apprentice
youth fur taker permits are subject to the requirements established under section 1533.102 of the
Revised Code and rules adopted pursuant to it.
(D)(1) No person shall issue a fur taker permit to an applicant unless it is accompanied by a
written explanation of the law in section 1533.17 of the Revised Code and the penalty for its
violation, including a description of terms of imprisonment and fines that may be imposed.
(2) No person shall issue a fur taker permit, other than an apprentice fur taker permit or an
apprentice youth fur taker permit, to an applicant unless the applicant presents to the agent
authorized to issue a fur taker permit a previously held hunting license or trapping or fur taker
permit or evidence of having held such a license or permit in content and manner approved by the
chief of the division of wildlife, a certificate of completion issued upon completion of a trapper
education course approved by the chief, or evidence of equivalent training in content and manner
approved by the chief. A previously held apprentice hunting license, apprentice fur taker permit, or
apprentice youth fur taker permit does not satisfy the requirement concerning the presentation of a
previously held hunting license or fur taker permit or evidence of such a license or permit.
(3) No person shall issue a fur taker permit, other than an apprentice fur taker permit or an
apprentice youth fur taker permit, to any person who fails to present the evidence required by this
section. No person shall purchase or obtain a fur taker permit, other than an apprentice fur taker
permit or an apprentice youth fur taker permit, without presenting to the issuing agent the evidence
required by this section. Issuance of a fur taker permit in violation of the requirements of this section

H. B. No. 64 136th G.A.
7
is an offense by both the purchaser of the illegally obtained permit and the clerk or agent who issued
the permit. Any fur taker permit issued in violation of this section is void.
(E) The chief, with approval of the wildlife council, shall adopt rules prescribing a trapper
education course for first-time fur taker permit buyers, other than buyers of apprentice fur taker
permits or apprentice youth fur taker permits, and for volunteer instructors. The course shall consist
of subjects that include, but are not limited to, trapping techniques, animal habits and identification,
trapping tradition and ethics, the trapper and conservation, the law in section 1533.17 of the Revised
Code along with the penalty for its violation, including a description of terms of imprisonment and
fines that may be imposed, and other law relating to trapping. Authorized personnel of the division
of wildlife or volunteer instructors approved by the chief shall conduct the courses with such
frequency and at such locations throughout the state as to reasonably meet the needs of permit
applicants. The chief shall issue a certificate of completion to each person who successfully
completes the course and passes an examination prescribed by the chief.
(F) Every person, while hunting or trapping fur-bearing animals on lands of another, shall
carry the person's fur taker permit with the person's signature written on the permit. Failure to carry
such a signed permit constitutes an offense under this section. The chief shall adopt any additional
rules the chief considers necessary to carry out this section.
(G) An owner who is a resident of this state or an owner who is exempt from obtaining a
hunting license under section 1533.10 of the Revised Code and the children of the owner of lands in
this state may hunt or trap fur-bearing animals thereon without a fur taker permit. If the owner of
land in this state is a limited liability company or a limited liability partnership that consists of three
or fewer individual members or partners, as applicable, an individual member or partner who is a
resident of this state and the member's or partner's children of any age may hunt or trap fur-bearing
animals on the land owned by the limited liability company or limited liability partnership without a
fur taker permit. In addition, if the owner of land in this state is a trust that has a total of three or
fewer trustees and beneficiaries, an individual who is a trustee or beneficiary and who is a resident
of this state and the individual's children of any age may hunt or trap fur-bearing animals on the land
owned by the trust without a fur taker permit. The tenant and children of the tenant may hunt or trap
fur-bearing animals on lands where they reside without a fur taker permit.
(H) A fur taker permit is not transferable. No person shall carry a fur taker permit issued in
the name of another person.
(I) A fur taker permit entitles a nonresident to take from this state fur-bearing animals taken
and possessed by the nonresident as provided by law or division rule.
Sec. 1533.32. (A) Except as provided in this section or division (A)(2) or (C) of section
1533.12 of the Revised Code or as exempted at the discretion of the chief of the division of wildlife,
no person, including nonresidents, shall take or catch any fish by angling in any of the waters in the
state or engage in fishing in those waters without a license. No person shall take or catch frogs or
turtles without a valid fishing license, except as provided in this section. Persons fishing in privately

H. B. No. 64 136th G.A.
8
owned ponds, lakes, or reservoirs to or from which fish are not accustomed to migrate are exempt
from the license requirements set forth in this section. Persons fishing in privately owned ponds,
lakes, or reservoirs that are open to public fishing through an agreement or lease with the division of
wildlife shall comply with the license requirements set forth in this section.
(B)(1) Except as otherwise provided in rules adopted under division (B) of section 1533.12
of the Revised Code, each applicant for a fishing license shall pay a fee for each license in
accordance with the following schedule:
1 2
A Annual fishing license – resident $24.00
B Annual fishing license – nonresident that is not a resident of a $49.00
reciprocal state
C Annual fishing license – nonresident that is a resident of a $24.00
reciprocal state
D Annual senior fishing license – resident $9.00
E Three-day tourist fishing license – nonresident that is not a $24.00
resident of a reciprocal state
F One-day fishing license $13.00
(2) As used in division (B)(1) of this section:
(a) "Reciprocal state" means a state that is a party to an agreement under section 1533.91 of
the Revised Code.
(b) "Senior" means an applicant who is sixty-six sixty-five years of age or older at the time
of application for a license.
(3) Any person under the age of sixteen years may take or catch frogs and turtles and take or
catch fish by angling without a license.
(C)(1) The chief of the division of wildlife may issue a tourist's license expiring three days
from the effective date of the license to a resident of a state that is not a party to an agreement under
section 1533.91 of the Revised Code.
(2) The chief shall adopt rules under section 1531.10 of the Revised Code providing for the
issuance of a one-day fishing license to a resident of this state or of any other state. A one-day
fishing license shall allow the holder to take or catch fish by angling in the waters in the state,
engage in fishing in those waters, or take or catch frogs or turtles in those waters for one day without
obtaining an annual license or a tourist's license under this section. At the request of a holder of a

H. B. No. 64 136th G.A.
9
one-day fishing license who wishes to obtain an annual license, a clerk or agent authorized to issue
licenses under section 1533.13 of the Revised Code, not later than the last day on which the one-day
license would be valid if it were an annual license, shall credit the amount of the fee paid for the
one-day license toward the fee charged for the annual license if so authorized by the chief. The clerk
or agent shall issue the annual license upon presentation of the one-day license and payment of a fee
in an amount equal to the difference between the fee for the annual license and the fee for the one-
day license.
(3) Unless otherwise provided by division rule, each annual license shall begin on the date of
issuance and expire a year from the date of issuance.
(4) Unless otherwise provided by division rule, each multi-year license issued in accordance
with section 1533.321 of the Revised Code shall begin on the date of issuance and expire three
years, five years, or ten years from the date of issuance, as applicable.
(5) No person shall alter a fishing license or possess a fishing license that has been altered.
(6) No person shall procure or attempt to procure a fishing license by fraud, deceit,
misrepresentation, or any false statement.
(7) A resident of this state who owns land over, through, upon, or along which any water
flows or stands, except where the land is in or borders on state parks or state-owned lakes, together
with the members of the immediate families of such owners, may take frogs and turtles and may take
or catch fish of the kind permitted to be taken or caught therefrom without procuring a license
provided for in this section. This exemption extends to tenants actually residing upon such lands and
to the members of the immediate families of the tenants. A resident of any other state who owns land
in this state over, through, upon, or along which any water flows or stands, except where the land is
in or borders on state parks or state-owned lakes, and the spouse and children living with the owner,
may take frogs and turtles and may take or catch fish of the kind permitted to be taken or caught
from that water without obtaining a license under this section, provided that the state of residence of
the owner allows residents of this state owning real property in that state, and the spouse and
children living with such a property owner, to take frogs and turtles and take or catch fish without a
license. If the owner of such land in this state is a limited liability company or a limited liability
partnership that consists of three or fewer individual members or partners, as applicable, an
individual member or partner who is a resident of this state and the member's or partner's children of
any age may take frogs and turtles and may take or catch fish of the kind permitted to be taken or
caught therefrom without procuring a license provided for in this section. In addition, if the owner of
such land in this state is a trust that has a total of three or fewer trustees and beneficiaries, an
individual who is a trustee or beneficiary and who is a resident of this state and the individual's
children of any age may take frogs and turtles and may take or catch fish of the kind permitted to be
taken or caught therefrom without procuring a license provided for in this section. Residents of state
or county institutions, charitable institutions, and military homes in this state may take frogs and
turtles without procuring the required license, provided that a member of the institution or home has

H. B. No. 64 136th G.A.
10
an identification card, which shall be carried on that person when fishing.
(8) Every fisher required to be licensed, while fishing or taking or attempting to take frogs or
turtles, shall carry the license and exhibit it to any person. Failure to so carry and exhibit the license
constitutes an offense under this section.
Sec. 1533.321. (A) The chief of the division of wildlife may issue any of the following:
(1) Multi-year hunting or fishing licenses for three-, five-, or ten-year terms to a resident of
this state;
(2) Lifetime hunting or fishing licenses to a resident of this state;
(3) A package consisting of any combination of license, stamp, or permit that the chief is
authorized to issue under this chapter.
(B) The chief may adopt rules in accordance with section 1531.10 of the Revised Code
governing multi-year hunting and fishing licenses, lifetime hunting and fishing licenses, and
combination packages, including rules establishing fees for the combination packages. The chief
shall ensure that the price for a combination package is not discounted by more than five per cent of
the total fees for the licenses, permits, or stamps that a person would otherwise pay for those
licenses, permits, or stamps if the person purchased them individually.
(C)(1) The multi-year and lifetime license fund is hereby created in the state treasury. The
fund shall consist of money received from application fees for multi-year and lifetime hunting and
fishing licenses.
(2) Each fiscal year, a prorated amount of the money from each multi-year and lifetime
license fee shall be transferred from the multi-year and lifetime license fund to the fund into which
the applicable single year license fee would otherwise be deposited. The prorated amount shall equal
the total amount of the fee charged for the license divided by the number of years the license is
valid. The chief shall adopt rules in accordance with section 1531.10 of the Revised Code for the
administration of this division, including establishing a system that prorates lifetime license fees for
deposit each year into the wildlife fund created in section 1531.17 of the Revised Code.
(3) Each fiscal year, all previous year's investment earnings from the multi-year and lifetime
license fund shall be transferred into the wildlife fund created in section 1531.17 of the Revised
Code.
(D)(1) Each applicant for a multi-year or lifetime fishing license who is a resident of this
state shall pay a fee for each license in accordance with the following schedule:
1 2
A Senior 3-year fishing license $26.00
B Senior 5-year fishing license $43.34

H. B. No. 64 136th G.A.
11
C Senior lifetime fishing license $81.00
D 3-year fishing license $69.34
E 5-year fishing license $115.56
F 10-year fishing license $231.12
G Lifetime fishing license $576.00
H Youth lifetime fishing license $414.00
(2) As used in division (D)(1) of this section:
(a) "Youth" means an applicant who is under the age of sixteen years at the time of
application for a license.
(b) "Senior" means an applicant who is sixty-six sixty-five years of age or older at the time
of application for a license.
(E)(1) Each applicant for a multi-year or lifetime hunting license who is a resident of this
state shall pay a fee for each license in accordance with the following schedule:
1 2
A Senior 3-year hunting license $26.00
B Senior 5-year hunting license $43.34
C Senior lifetime hunting license $81.00
D Youth 3-year hunting license $26.00
E Youth 5-year hunting license $43.34
F Youth 10-year hunting license $86.67
G Youth lifetime hunting license $414.00
H 3-year hunting license $52.00
I 5-year hunting license $86.75

H. B. No. 64 136th G.A.
12
J 10-year hunting license $173.34
K Lifetime hunting license $432.00
(2) As used in division (E)(1) of this section:
(a) "Youth" means an applicant who is under the age of eighteen years at the time of
application for a license.
(b) "Senior" means an applicant who is sixty-six sixty-five years of age or older at the time
of application for a license.
(F) If a person who is issued a multi-year hunting or fishing license or lifetime hunting or
fishing license in accordance with division (A) of this section subsequently becomes a nonresident
after issuance of the license, the person's license remains valid in this state during its term,
regardless of residency status.
S 2. That existing sections 1533.10, 1533.11, 1533.111, 1533.32, and 1533.321 of the
ECTION
Revised Code are hereby repealed.

H. B. No. 64 136th G.A.
Speaker ___________________ of the House of Representatives.
President ___________________ of the Senate.
Passed ________________________, 20____
Approved ________________________, 20____
Governor.

H. B. No. 64 136th G.A.
The section numbering of law of a general and permanent nature is
complete and in conformity with the Revised Code.
Director, Legislative Service Commission.
Filed in the office of the Secretary of State at Columbus, Ohio, on the ____
day of ___________, A. D. 20____.
Secretary of State.
File No. _________ Effective Date ___________________